Nebraska, session 109, LB173.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB173 LB173
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $13,062,234 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $14,062,234 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 as aid to community colleges, for Agency 83, Program 151, to
provide state aid to community colleges for dual enrollment.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$13,062,234 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $14,062,234 General Funds for
state aid for dual enrollment, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The funds appropriated in this section for dual enrollment shall be
distributed to community college areas in direct proportion to the full-
time equivalent enrollment in dual-credit courses delivered by the
respective community college areas based upon dual-enrollment credit hour
data reported to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
by the respective community college areas for the year in which those
enrollments occurred.
For purposes of this section, dual-enrollment course means a course
delivered to a student for which credit may be applied toward high school
graduation requirements or will be reported on the student's high school
transcript and for which credit may be applied toward graduation at a
postsecondary educational institution. It is the intent of the
Legislature that amounts distributed to each community college area in
proportion to enrollment in dual-enrollment courses be applied to support
discounting of tuition assessed for enrollment in such courses.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-